New Mexico, session 2026, SB211.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--Five million dollars ($5,000,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the local government division of the department of finance and administration for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 for construction and equipment at Rodriguez park in the city of Las Vegas. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the general fund. .233544.1